District of Columbia statutes.
5-119.08

Ownership claim by other than person arrested.

If any claim to the ownership of such property or money shall be made on oath before the court, by or in behalf of any other persons than the persons arrested, and the accused person shall be held for trial or examination, such property or money shall remain in the custody of the Property Clerk until the discharge or conviction of the persons accused.

History

R.S., D.C., § 415

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-119.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-159.
1973 Ed., § 4-158.